FBReader.Hyphen/Resources/en.pattern
x1q
ei2
e1j
e1f
1to
2tl
ou2
w3c
1tu
e1q
4tv
tw4
1ty
o1q
4tz
4tc
d2y
d1w
d1v
1du
1ta
4eu
1pa
s4y
1dr
oo2
d1p
sw2
4sv
1do
d1m
1fa
d1j
1su
4fd
o2n
4fh
1fi
4fm
4fn
1fo
pd4
2ft
3fu
1fy
1ga
2ss
s1r
u5j
d5c
d1b
g3b
gd4
4uk
2ok
1cy
o5j
gl2
g1m
4pf
4pg
1go
g3p
1gr
1so
c1q
gs2
oi2
g3w
1gy
sk2
1co
c5n
h1b
ck1
h1f
h1h
4hk
1zo
1ci
4zm
s2h
h1w
2ch
5zl
2id
c3c
2us
2ig
i3h
i3j
4ik
1ca
b1v
sa2
2bt
r1w
4bp
2io
2ip
u3u
4ir
bk4
b1j
1va
2ze
2bf
4oa
r1p
4nz
4zb
i1u
2iv
4iy
5ja
1je
za1
y1w
k1b
k3f
kh4
k1i
kk4
k1l
k1m
k5t
k1w
2ld
r1m
n1t
2lf
r1l
r3j
4lj
l1l
2lm
2lp
4lt
n1r
rh4
v4y
n1q
1ly
1ma
w1b
rg2
r1f
wi2
4ao
2mh
w4k
r1c
w5p
4mk
m1m
1mo
4wt
wy4
x1a
r1b
a2n
n5m
x1e
x1h
4mt
x3i
1mu
qu2
p3w
x3o
4mw
a1j
x3p
1na
ai2
x1u
a2f
xx4
y1b
a2d
n1j
y1c
n3f
pr2
y1d
y1i
4dry
n2it
ni4o
n1in
n1im
 up3
nik4
ni4d
y5gi
ye4t
yes4
 ye4
4ab 
nhe4
nha4
abe2
n2gy
n1gu
y1er
y5ee
p2pe
4abr
y3la
y3lo
ne4w
ne4v
1nes
y3ch
n1er
ne2q
3neo
1nen
p2se
ps4h
y2ce
y5lu
2ned
ne2c
yme4
4nk2
y5at
2adi
ne2b
2ne 
y5ac
2p1t
p2te
n1de
n1cu
n1cr
yn5d
p2th
4adu
p4tw
pub3
ae4r
xu3a
yn5g
aff4
pue4
n2au
4p1p
puf4
n2at
ag1i
pu4m
ag1n
a2go
n4as
x3ti
x1t2
pu2n
a4gy
a3ha
a3he
ah4l
a3ho
 ti2
a5ia
n2an
5pus
pu2t
nak4
 th2
n1kl
 te4
 ta4
mu4u
4mup
mun2
3mum
2ale
x4ob
 sy2
5ynx
al1i
 st4
y1o4
xi5c
xi5a
4alm
 si2
 sh2
m5si
xhu4
m4sh
4m3r
4ama
m2py
2rab
m2pi
xhi2
yo5d
r2ai
4m1p
mo2v
mos2
x2ed
mo2r
4n1l
a2mo
r2as
x3c2
xas5
yom4
x4ap
xam3
nme4
4mok
rbi2
nne4
4and
y4os
p4ot
3noe
mn4o
mn4a
4m1n
4nog
4m1l
2ang
ws4l
1pos
w3sh
wri4
wra4
yp3i
wom1
1wo2
m2iz
rb4o
w4no
po4p
r2ce
m2is
rd2i
ano4
mig4
y3po
mi3a
wiz5
5mi 
no4n
4m1f
me4v
2re 
wir4
2mes
1men
me2m
me2g
re1o
2med
4me 
4nop
4m5c
4m1b
wil2
1nou
reu2
whi4
w3ev
4map
rev2
w1er
a2pl
po4c
rfu4
r4fy
y5pu
2mah
a3pu
2mab
2a2r
n1p4
npi4
4lyb
4lya
2p3n
wam4
2l1w
1lut
4lup
lu3o
r1gl
luf4
lu5a
2wac
ltu2
y3ro
l1tr
4vv4
r3gu
yr4r
l1te
4rh 
nru4
ar1i
l2se
l4sc
4l1r
l5pr
l4pl
ys4c
4lov
ri3a
r4ib
4lof
3lo 
ar2p
ar3q
 os3
ll4o
ll2i
4as 
ri1o
3vok
l2le
voi4
4p1m
lka3
5vo 
ns4c
as4l
l1iz
r4iq
r2is
3viv
l1it
3lik
a2ta
n2se
n2sl
rle4
2l3h
lgo3
l5ga
l5fr
ns3m
vi4p
3ley
 od2
r2me
les2
4ath
r4my
le2a
l3dr
v1in
ldi4
l2de
2vil
nt2i
l3ci
vik4
lce4
2l1b
4lav
v3if
rno4
r3nu
a1tr
r2oc
nt4s
y4so
k4sy
ks4l
a2tu
k4sc
k3ou
ko5r
yss4
a2ty
au4b
4kly
ys1t
nu1a
kis4
au3r
ki4p
ro4e
k4im
a2va
5ki 
nu4d
n4um
n3uo
kes4
k1er
av1i
rok2
ke4g
1kee
k2ed
 me2
aw3i
kal4
aws4
k5ag
k3ab
3ka 
aye4
ays4
veg3
jo4p
5ba 
4ved
jew3
n1v2
4ve 
ja4p
zar2
3vat
izi4
n1w4
1bat
ba4z
2b1b
b2be
ix4o
4i5w
4b1d
4be 
rox5
nym4
nyp4
n3za
4itt
r3po
r1r4
i1ti
1bel
2ith
2ite
i2su
4rs2
r1sa
rs4c
r2se
is1p
3bet
vag4
i2so
r1sh
be3w
r1si
oad3
4b3h
bi2b
bi4d
3bie
3isf
4ise
2is 
1bil
r1sp
5va 
r5sw
 le2
uz4e
ir1i
bi2t
uxu3
r1ti
u1v2
i1ra
ze4n
ze4p
b2l2
uu4m
o1bi
ip3i
z1er
ipe4
b4lo
uts4
4b1m
4b3n
o3br
3bod
i4os
bo4e
ru3a
io4m
i1ol
4io 
3boo
o1ce
4iny
in1u
2ins
ru2n
2inn
4inl
4ink
rv4e
2ini
och4
2ine
r3vo
4ind
pi2n
p4id
bt4l
b4to
b3tr
ry4c
ry3t
2in 
o4el
bu4n
i2mu
im1i
5sai
il3v
4iln
il1i
il5f
s1ap
o3er
4b5w
5by 
bys4
 in1
sau4
i1la
zet4
u2su
o3ev
2z1i
i2go
4igi
us1p
5saw
4s5b
o2fi
4ift
i3fl
4if 
i3et
sch2
usc2
2ie4
i2du
i4dr
i2di
id5d
pi3a
u3ru
z4il
s1cu
z4is
4s5d
4se 
se4a
2ce 
2ici
4ich
3cei
i1br
i5bo
1cen
i1bl
se2g
5sei
ibe4
3cep
i2an
iam4
ur2l
i2al
2i1a
cet4
hy2s
cew4
1phy
4ch 
5phu
hu4t
hu4g
che2
h4ty
h4sh
ur1d
urc4
4hr4
4h5p
5sev
5sex
u1ra
4s3f
up3p
2s3g
ph3t
2sh 
ho4g
2h1n
 he2
3cia
u3pl
4h1m
ci5c
h2lo
zo4m
4cii
hi2v
hi4p
2cim
2cin
4phs
u1pe
u1ou
o1ge
u5os
heu4
sho4
he4t
h1es
4shw
un5z
un5y
si1b
unu4
5ciz
o4gl
ck3i
hep5
he2n
h4ed
1sio
ph2l
5haz
si2r
cly4
zte4
 ge2
1sis
coe2
2cog
5siu
1siv
5siz
 ga2
4ske
s1l2
s2le
ha4m
2s1m
s3ma
1ogy
o1h2
u1ni
3gus
3gun
2gue
gu4a
cov1
gth3
 eu3
g4ro
s1n4
 es3
u2ne
z4zy
um2p
u1mi
3som
 ev2
oig4
cri2
gov1
5goo
s4op
gon2
ul5v
5goe
u3lu
gob5
3go 
2c1t
4ph 
g1no
g1ni
c2te
4sov
4uls
gn4a
g4my
c4tw
cud5
c4uf
c4ui
pe2t
3glo
1gle
ul2i
gla4
 eg2
3giz
3cun
5giv
gi4u
3gir
5gio
1cus
ul4e
2spa
gil4
g1ic
5gi 
 eb4
cze4
1d2a
5da 
u1la
ggo4
4daf
2dag
g2ge
ge4v
1geo
1gen
2ged
3dat
o1la
2ge 
ol2d
ol2i
5day
pek4
p4ee
d1d4
2de 
4gaz
ol2t
uiv3
ol2v
o2ly
s1sa
2gam
gaf4
o2me
ui4n
2ui2
pe2c
d4em
4fug
i4jk
u3fl
3ufa
f2ty
f4to
1den
u4du
4pe 
2f3s
fri2
de1p
s1si
4f5p
fos5
d3eq
s4sl
s4sn
fo2r
ss2t
des2
5fon
4p1b
 ci2
3pay
ss5w
2st 
de1t
f4l2
de1v
2fin
4dey
4d1f
d4ga
st2i
dg1i
d2gy
d1h2
5di 
ud5d
fi3a
u4cy
 ch4
pav4
3did
u3cu
d1if
f2fy
u3cr
d1in
st4r
4f1f
fev4
fer1
1dio
2fed
fe4b
dir2
s2ty
4fe 
dis1
on1a
u3ca
4f5b
on1c
2ond
d5k2
5far
4fag
pa1p
eys4
5eyc
1exp
s4ul
2dly
p4al
e3wh
on3s
3do 
e1wa
5doe
e5vu
d4og
e1vi
su2m
su2n
ub4e
uav4
su2r
p4ai
6rk 
d4or
3dos
u1at
do4v
3dox
p4ad
oo4k
4swo
o2pa
dre4
eus4
e3up
e5un
2oph
et5z
4syc
3syl
4y3h
oy1a
ds4p
d4sw
d4sy
d2th
o4wo
3ta 
du2c
4etn
2tab
ta2l
uac4
es4w
du4g
2ess
4uab
du4n
4dup
tav4
st5b
ow1i
o1pr
5dyn
2taw
e1sp
2t1b
op1u
ead1
tz4e
t4ch
opy5
ea4l
4t1d
4te 
2tyl
e1si
4esh
1tee
4tya
t1cr
4two
teg4
es2c
4eru
1teo
er1s
2ero
ea2t
te4p
o1ra
t1wh
3tus
ea2v
3teu
3tex
er1i
2e1b
er1h
4tey
2t1f
4t1g
e3br
2th 
th2e
4thl
e1ce
3tum
ec2i
2ths
2erb
1tia
4tue
er1a
ou5v
tud2
tif2
2tig
e1po
tu1a
ou4l
ttu4
1tim
t5to
os4l
e1cr
e2pa
t4sw
e5ow
e1cu
e4ot
tsh4
eos4
e1or
t4sc
e3ol
4edi
eo2g
e5of
1tio
4eno
4enn
5tiq
4edo
ti4u
1tiv
e3my
1tiz
4oth
ee2c
t5la
ee2f
t5lo
4t1m
ee2m
tme4
e1me
em5b
coi4
to3b
e5ex
o1ry
2tof
1eff
el2i
el2f
tos2
4t1p
e1la
1tra
os2c
eig2
ei5d
e5ic
o2so
e1h4
5egy
eg5n
 ach4
e4go 
e4gos
eg1ul
e5gur
tre5f
eg4ic
eher4
eg5ib
eger4
4egal
tre4m
ei5gl
e3imb
e3inf
e1ing
tra3b
eir4d
eit3e
ei3th
e5ity
5tria
e4jud
3efit
eki4n
ek4la
2trim
e4la 
e4lac
tri4v
4tout
e4law
5tour
e3lea
efil4
5elec
e4led
to2ra
e5len
4tony
e1les
tro3v
e4fic
4tono
to3my
tom4b
to2ma
to5ic
e5lim
to2gr
e3lio
e2lis
tru5i
4todo
4ella
ee4ty
ello4
e5loc
el5og
eest4
el2sh
el4ta
e5lud
el5ug
e4mac
e4mag
e5man
2t1n2
ee2s4
ee4p1
e2mel
e4met
ee4na
emi4e
ee4ly
eel3i
3tled
3tle 
e4mis
tlan4
eed3i
em3iz
trus4
emo4g
ti3za
em3pi
e4mul
e4dul
emu3n
e4dri
tiv4a
edon2
e4dol
ti3tl
e5nea
e5nee
en3em
tis4p
ti5so
tis4m
3tise
e3new
ti3sa
e5nie
e5nil
e3nio
edi5z
en3it
e5niu
5eniz
ed1it
ed3im
eno4g
e4nos
en3ov
en4sw
ti5oc
4t1s2
en3ua
en5uf
e3ny 
4en3z
ed3ib
e3dia
e4oi4
ede4s
3tini
4ed3d
eo3re
t2ina
2e2da
e4cul
eo4to
e5out
ec4te
4t3t2
t4tes
2t1in
e5pel
4timp
e2cor
ephe4
e4pli
e2col
5tigu
tu3ar
ti5fy
tu4bi
e3pro
3tien
ep4sh
5tidi
e4put
t4ico
eci4t
4tick
2ti2b
ec3im
era4b
ti4ab
er3ar
4tuf4
5tu3i
er4bl
er3ch
e4cib
2ere 
4thoo
ecca5
4thil
3thet
4thea
3ture
than4
e4cad
e4bit
ere4q
e4ben
5turi
eret4
tur5o
eav5o
eav5i
tu5ry
4tess
4tes 
ter5v
e1rio
4erit
er4iu
eri4v
1teri
er3m4
ter3c
te5pe
4t1wa
er3no
east3
er5ob
e5roc
ero4r
er1ou
e3ass
ea5sp
1tent
4ertl
er3tw
twis4
eru4t
3tend
e1s4a
3tenc
5tels
ear2t
e2sca
teli4
e3scr
es5cu
e1s2e
e2sec
3tel 
te5gi
ear5k
ear4c
te5di
ear3a
e3sha
2t1ed
e5and
e2sic
e2sid
5tect
tece4
4teat
type3
ty5ph
esi4u
ea4ge
es4mi
e2sol
e3act
e2son
e1a4b
dys5p
dy4se
du4pe
taun4
d3ule
ta5sy
tas4e
4tare
4tarc
tar4a
ta5pl
2estr
ta5mo
4talk
e2sur
tal3i
du5el
eta4b
ta5la
e3teo
ua5na
et1ic
4taf4
etin4
ta5do
e5tir
4taci
uan4i
d1uca
d1u1a
e3tra
e3tre
2d1s2
syn5o
uar2d
4drow
et3ua
et5ym
dro4p
dril4
dri4b
5dren
eu3ro
uar3i
eute4
4drai
eu5tr
uar3t
e2vas
dop4p
e5vea
doo3d
doni4
u4bel
sum3i
ev1er
doli4
do4la
ev3id
evi4l
e4vin
evi4v
e5voc
2d5of
do5de
e4wag
e5wee
4d1n4
ewil5
4d5lu
e3wit
2d3lo
u3ber
5eye 
u1b4i
3dled
fa3bl
fab3r
fa4ce
3dle 
fain4
suit3
su5is
su2g3
4d5la
su4b3
fa3ta
su1al
4fato
1di1v
d2iti
5disi
uci4b
feas4
di1re
di4pl
4feca
5fect
dio5g
fe3li
fe4mo
fen2d
4st3w
uc4it
5ferr
5dini
ucle3
f4fes
f4fie
4stry
1dina
f4fly
di3ge
3dict
d4ice
dia5b
s4top
s1tle
5stir
s3tif
s4tie
s1tic
fic4i
s5tia
s4ti 
4fics
fi3cu
ud3er
s3the
fil5i
ste2w
4fily
udev4
5fina
s4ted
fi2ne
s2tal
fin4n
s2tag
de2to
de4su
flin4
u1dic
f2ly5
ud5is
u5dit
de1sc
d2es 
der5s
fon4t
u4don
5derm
ss4li
d4erh
for4i
s4sie
de2pu
depi4
fra4t
f5rea
de3pa
de3nu
fril4
frol5
ud4si
de3no
u4ene
uens4
ug5in
fu5el
5dem 
s5set
fu5ne
fu3ri
fusi4
fus4s
4futa
de5lo
de5if
4dee 
5gal 
3gali
ga3lo
2d1ed
s3sel
g5amo
s2s5c
ssas3
u1ing
4gano
uir4m
gass4
gath3
uita4
deaf5
dav5e
5dav4
4dato
4dary
geez4
4spot
spor4
s4pon
4gely
dark5
s4ply
4spio
4geno
4geny
dard5
ge3om
g4ery
5gesi
geth5
4geto
ge4ty
dan3g
4g1g2
da2m2
g3ger
gglu5
dach4
gh3in
spil4
gh4to
4cutr
1gi4a
gia5r
ula5b
spho5
g4ico
gien5
s2phe
ulch4
2sper
spa4n
5spai
3c4ut
u1len
ul4gi
gir4l
g3isl
cu5py
cu3pi
cu4mi
c3ume
cu2ma
so5vi
5glas
u5lia
gli4b
g3lig
5culi
glo3r
4ul3m
ctu4r
u1l4o
g4na 
c3ter
ul1ti
g2nin
g4nio
4ultu
g4non
cta4b
4c3s2
cru4d
ul5ul
sor5d
go3is
um5ab
sor5c
cris4
go3ni
c4rin
son4g
sona4
5gos 
cri5f
cre4v
um4bi
5cred
g4rai
gran2
5solv
soft3
so4ce
unat4
4gray
gre4n
co5zi
4grit
coz5e
gruf4
cow5a
g5ste
cove4
cos4e
s5men
un4er
smel4
4corb
co4pl
4gu4t
co3pa
con5t
sman3
gy5ra
con3g
hach4
hae4m
hae4t
h5agu
ha3la
c4one
con4a
un4im
s3lat
u2nin
han4g
s3ket
5colo
col5i
han4k
uni3v
hap3l
hap5t
tras4
co4gr
har2d
co5ag
sir5a
clim4
5sion
has5s
haun4
4clic
haz3a
cle4m
1head
3hear
un3s4
s3ing
un4sw
s2ina
2s1in
4sily
sil4e
h5elo
hem4p
4clar
hena4
5sidi
heo5r
1c4l4
h4era
s5icc
2c1it
u4ors
h3ern
shor4
h3ery
ci3ph
shon3
4cipe
cion4
5cino
c1ing
c4ina
hi5an
hi4co
high5
h4il2
shiv5
h4ina
3ship
3cili
hir4l
hi3ro
hir4p
hir4r
sh3io
his4s
sh1in
ci4la
u5pia
4h1l4
hlan4
4cier
5shev
cia5r
hmet4
ch4ti
sh1er
h5ods
3cho2
hoge4
chi2z
3chit
ho4ma
home3
hon4a
ho5ny
3hood
hoon4
5chio
uptu4
4ura 
ho5ru
hos4e
sew4i
hos1p
1hous
u4rag
ses5t
u4ras
ur4be
hree5
se5sh
s1e4s
4h1s2
4ched
h4tar
ht1en
ht5es
ur4fr
u3rif
ser4o
s4erl
hun4t
sen5g
ur1in
u3rio
sen4d
hy3pe
hy3ph
u1rit
ces5t
ur3iz
4cesa
4senc
ur4no
4ianc
ian3i
4seme
ia5pe
iass4
5selv
5self
i4atu
3cent
se1le
4ceni
ib5ia
ib3in
seg3r
uros4
3cenc
ib3li
3cell
5cel 
s5edl
i5bun
4icam
5icap
4icar
4s4ed
3sect
icas5
i4cay
iccu4
4iceo
ur4pe
4ced 
i5cid
sea5w
i2cip
seas4
i4cly
ur4pi
4i1cr
5icra
i4cry
ic4te
ictu2
ccon4
urti4
ic4um
ic5uo
i3cur
cci4a
i4dai
ccha5
ca4th
scof4
ide4s
4casy
s4cli
scle5
i5die
id3io
s4cho
id1it
id5iu
i3dle
i4dom
id3ow
u5sad
u5san
id5uo
us4ap
ied4e
cany4
ield3
s4ces
ien4e
i5enn
4scei
i1er 
i3esc
i1est
us3ci
use5a
s4ced
scav5
if4fr
sca4p
i3fie
u5sia
u3sic
can4e
iga5b
can5d
4calo
us5sl
i3gib
ig3il
ig3in
ig3it
i4g4l
us1tr
ig3or
ig5ot
i5gre
igu5i
ig1ur
2c5ah
4i5i4
4cag4
cach4
ca1bl
usur4
sat3u
sa5ta
b5uto
i3leg
il1er
ilev4
uta4b
4buta
il3ia
il2ib
il3io
3sanc
2ilit
il2iz
sal4t
5bust
il3oq
il4ty
il5ur
u3tat
i4mag
sa5lo
sal4m
4ute 
4imet
bu3re
s3act
5sack
2s1ab
4imit
im4ni
i3mon
4utel
bumi4
bu3li
bu4ga
4inav
4uten
bsor4
2b5s2
u4tis
4brit
i3nee
rvi4v
r3vic
4inga
4inge
r3vey
4ingi
r3ven
4ingo
4ingu
u4t1l
i5ni 
i4nia
in3io
in1is
bo4to
r5usc
runk5
both5
b5ota
5bos4
2i1no
5bori
ino4s
i4not
5bore
in3se
ru3in
2int 
ru4gl
bor5d
i5nus
ut5of
5bor 
uto5g
ioge4
io2gr
bon4a
u5ton
ru3en
u4tou
ion3i
io5ph
ior3i
bod3i
io5th
i5oti
io4to
i4our
bne5g
b3lis
rt4sh
blen4
ip4ic
r3tri
ip3ul
i3qua
r4tiv
r3tig
rti4d
b4le 
b5itz
ira4b
i4rac
ird5e
rt5ib
i4ref
bi3tr
i4res
ir5gi
bi5ou
rte5o
ir4is
r3teb
r4tag
bin4d
iro4g
vac3u
ir5ul
2b3if
is5ag
is3ar
isas5
2is1c
is3ch
bi4er
is3er
bi5en
rson3
be5yo
r5sha
is3ib
isi4d
i5sis
be3tw
4is4k
rs3es
4isms
be5tr
r3sec
va4ge
is2pi
is4py
4is1s
be3sp
4bes4
be5nu
val5o
is1te
is1ti
rrys4
rros4
4be5m
is5us
4ita 
rron4
i4tag
rri4v
i3tan
i3tat
be3lo
rri4o
r4reo
it4es
be1li
be5gu
4itia
rre4f
rre4c
be3gi
it3ig
be3di
i2tim
2itio
4itis
rp4h4
r3pet
4iton
r4pea
it5ry
be3de
be3da
i5tud
it3ul
4itz 
4be2d
beat3
beak4
ro4va
ro4ty
ros4s
ro5ro
iv5io
iv1it
ror3i
5root
1room
val1u
b3ber
va5mo
4izar
va5pi
ron4e
ban3i
jac4q
ban4e
bal1a
jer5s
rom4p
rom4i
ba4ge
azz5i
5judg
ay5al
ax4id
ax4ic
kais4
aw4ly
3away
a1vor
av5oc
av3ig
ke5li
v3el 
ve4lo
v4ely
ro1fe
ke4ty
v4erd
v4e2s
a5van
av3ag
5k2ic
k4ill
kilo5
au1th
k4in 
4ves 
ro3cr
kin4g
ve4te
aun5d
k5ish
au4l2
au3gu
4kley
augh3
ve4ty
k5nes
1k2no
at3ul
kosh4
at5ue
kro5n
4k1s2
at5ua
at4th
at5te
5vian
at4sk
5vidi
l4abo
laci4
l4ade
la3dy
lag4n
lam3o
3land
rob3l
a4tos
r4nou
lar4g
lar3i
las4e
a4top
r3niv
r3nit
a2tom
r5nic
a4tog
lbin4
4l1c2
vi5gn
at3if
at1ic
a5tia
r3ney
r5net
4ati 
ld5is
at4ho
l4dri
v2inc
le4bi
left5
5leg 
5legg
r4ner
r3nel
4len 
3lenc
r4nar
1lent
le3ph
le4pr
vin5d
ler4e
3lerg
r3mit
l4ero
at5ev
r4mio
5lesq
3less
r3men
l3eva
4ving
rma5c
vio3l
